Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1402.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-902, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-902. Periods of probation; monitoring; fees A. Unless terminated sooner, probation may continue for the following periods: 1. For a class 2 felony, seven years. 2. For a class 3 felony, five years. 3. For a class 4 felony, four years. 4. For a class 5 or 6 felony, three years. 5. For a class 1 misdemeanor, three years. 6. For a class 2 misdemeanor, two years. 7. For a class 3 misdemeanor, one year. B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, unless terminated sooner, probation may continue for the following periods: 1. For a violation of section 28-1381 or 28-1382, five years. 2. For a violation of section 28-1383, ten years. C. If the court has required, as a condition of probation, that the defendant make restitution for any economic loss related to the defendant's offense and that condition has not been satisfied, the court at any time before the termination or expiration of probation may extend the period within the following limits: 1. For a felony, not more than five years. 2. For a misdemeanor, not more than two years. D. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, justice courts and municipal courts may impose the probation periods specified in subsection A, paragraphs 5, 6 and 7 and subsection B, paragraph 1 of this section. E. After conviction of a felony offense or an attempt to commit any offense that is included in chapter 14 or 35.1 of this title or section 13-2308.01, 13-2308.03, 13-2923, 13-3212 or 13-3623, if probation is available, probation may continue for a term of not less than the term that is specified in subsection A of this section up to and including life and that the court believes is appropriate for the ends of justice. F. After conviction of a violation of section 13-3824, subsection A, if a term of probation is imposed and the offense for which the person was required to register was a felony, probation may continue for a term of not less than the term that is specified in subsection A of this section up to and including life and that the court believes is appropriate for the ends of justice. G. If a person is convicted on or after November 1, 2006 of a dangerous crime against children as defined in section 13-705, a term of probation is imposed, the person is required to register pursuant to section 13-3821 and the person is classified as a level three offender pursuant to section 13-3825, the court shall require global position system or electronic monitoring for the duration of the term of probation.  The court may shall impose a fee on the probationer to offset the cost of the monitoring device required by this subsection. The fee shall be deposited in the adult probation services fund pursuant to section 12-267, subsection A, paragraph 3. This subsection does not preclude global position system or electronic monitoring of any other person who is serving a term of probation. END_STATUTE